Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299A.625] SCHOOL SAFETY GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Capital safety improvement project" means the acquisition or betterment of buildings or other fixed assets and other improvements of a capital nature to improve the physical safety of people in schools and on school grounds. new text end new text begin (c) "Noncapital safety improvements" means safety-related improvements, equipment, systems, or software that are not capital in nature and support the physical safety of people in schools and on school grounds. new text end new text begin (d) "School" means: new text end new text begin (1) a public or nonpublic school that enrolls students in prekindergarten through grade 12, or any portion thereof, and is housed in a building classified as Group E Occupancy under the State Fire Code; or new text end new text begin (2) a child day care center classified as a Group E or Group I-4 Occupancy under the State Fire Code. new text end new text begin (e) "Minnesota School Safety Center" or "Center" means the program within the Department of Public Safety dedicated to supporting safe and secure learning environments. If the Minnesota School Safety Center is not operational, the responsibilities delegated to the Center in this section are delegated to the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible applicants and projects. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for a grant from bond proceeds under this section, the school property owner must be a public entity and the project must be a capital safety improvement project. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for a grant from the school safety improvement account in the special revenue fund, the owner of the school property to be improved may be a public entity, Tribal government, or private entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Approved vendors; comprehensive security systems. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota School Safety Center must prepare a list of vendors authorized to provide the security services and products described in this paragraph. The list must only include vendors that have been operating for at least two years and have experience providing the school security services and products described in this paragraph. The eligible school must use grant money to contract with an authorized vendor to implement and install security equipment, components, or systems, as determined by the school in consultation with an authorized vendor. Grant money may be used for the eligible school's current security systems and training for school staff on using the security systems. The security systems may include a system to alert local law enforcement of an immediate security threat within each room in the school. Grant money may be used for as many of the following components as an authorized vendor recommends: new text end new text begin (1) bullet-resistant interior doors and windows; new text end new text begin (2) ballistic wall panels; new text end new text begin (3) magnetic door-locking systems; new text end new text begin (4) remote lock-down activation systems; new text end new text begin (5) a mass notification system unified with an emergency communication system; new text end new text begin (6) an emergency building access system for first responders including fire, emergency medical services, and law enforcement personnel; new text end new text begin (7) an access control system with remote door-release capabilities; new text end new text begin (8) electronic access controls for main distribution frame and independent distribution frame rooms with a key override; new text end new text begin (9) classroom duress alarms linked to a law enforcement and administration notification system; new text end new text begin (10) security system training for staff to initiate emergency protocols; new text end new text begin (11) ballistic security glass for interior door vision panels and sidelites; new text end new text begin (12) electronic access control systems for primary building entrances; and new text end new text begin (13) classroom door installations that optimize safety and security. new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota School Safety Center must provide districts and charter schools with the list of authorized vendors identified in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin An applicant for a grant under this section must submit a written application to the Minnesota School Safety Center using the form, timeline, and procedures the Center prescribes. The written application must include: new text end new text begin (1) a description of the project or improvements proposed for funding by a grant under this section; new text end new text begin (2) the rationale for the project or improvements, including a description of the population attending the school; new text end new text begin (3) an estimate of total costs for the project or improvements, with costs broken out by individual phases, including but not limited to predesign, design, construction, engineering, furnishing, and equipping; new text end new text begin (4) a breakdown of the portions of the project or improvements that are capital and that are noncapital; new text end new text begin (5) the requested amount; new text end new text begin (6) the owner of the property to be improved; new text end new text begin (7) the entity authorized to make decisions for and enter into legal commitments on behalf of the property owner; new text end new text begin (8) the sources and amounts of state and nonstate funds previously received and committed to the project or improvements; new text end new text begin (9) the public purpose achieved by the project or improvements; new text end new text begin (10) an estimated timeline for completing the project or improvement; new text end new text begin (11) a contact person to answer clarifying questions about the application for the project or improvements; and new text end new text begin (12) any additional information requested by the Center. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prioritization of requests. new text end new text begin (a) If money available for this program is insufficient to fund all eligible grant requests, the Minnesota School Safety Center must award grants based on a prioritized ranking of the projects according to the following factors: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrated local support for the project; new text end new text begin (2) the need for the project; new text end new text begin (3) long-term costs of maintaining the funded improvements; and new text end new text begin (4) cost of requested improvement compared to anticipated increase in safety. new text end new text begin (b) The Center must ensure that grant money is allocated equitably across the state's regions, including between the metropolitan area and greater Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Match. new text end new text begin An applicant for a grant under this section must demonstrate the commitment of a match for the project with nonstate funds, unless the applicant is: new text end new text begin (1) located in a city with a net tax capacity per capita that is less than the median net tax capacity per capita among the cities statewide; or new text end new text begin (2) experiencing hardship. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Grant amount. new text end new text begin (a) A school may apply for one or more grants totaling up to $....... per year for approved costs of capital and noncapital safety improvement projects. new text end new text begin (b) Each grant must be for at least the amount required to complete one or more project phases, minus any nonstate funds already committed to the project. new text end new text begin (c) Any remaining balance of the grant amount awarded after the availability period described in section 16A.642 is canceled to the account or fund from which it was appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Notifications. new text end new text begin The Minnesota School Safety Center must promptly notify each applicant of the grant decision. For approved projects, the notification must include the grant amount awarded, the required match, and the deadline for money availability. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Applicability of other laws. new text end new text begin (a) Chapter 16A applies to grants made from general obligation bond proceeds and to grants made from the school safety improvement account in the special revenue fund for capital safety improvement projects. new text end new text begin (b) Grant money is available until the project is completed or abandoned subject to section 16A.642. new text end new text begin (c) A school improved with a grant from bond proceeds is state bond financed property subject to section 16A.642. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Administration and monitoring. new text end new text begin Up to five percent of any appropriation under this section may be used for administration and monitoring of the program. The Minnesota School Safety Center must use the money appropriated, other than proceeds from the sale of general obligation bonds, to provide technical assistance, education, and support for program applicants, as needed, and may contract with a third party to provide such services. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Report to legislature. new text end new text begin On or before January 31, 2027, and every January 31 thereafter, the Minnesota School Safety Center must submit a report as required under section 3.195 that details the grants awarded under this section, including the total grants distributed, the recipients of the grants, the projects supported by the grants, and any other information the commissioner deems appropriate. A copy of this report must also be sent to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the house of representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over capital investment, education, and public safety. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [299A.709] SCHOOL SAFETY IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNT. new text end new text begin The school safety improvement account is created in the special revenue fund, consisting of appropriations made from funds, other than from the bond proceeds fund, for school safety improvements under section 299A.625. Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of public safety for the grant awards under section 299A.625. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Minnesota School Safety Center to provide grants for capital school safety improvement projects eligible under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.625, subdivision 2, paragraph (a). new text end Sec. 4. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the general fund to the school safety improvement account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.709, for grants for school safety improvement projects eligible under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.625, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). new text end